District of Columbia statutes.
47-3713

Duty of personal representative.

The personal representative of every decedent subject to the tax imposed by this chapter shall, before distribution of the estate, pay to the Mayor any taxes, penalties, and interest due under this chapter. The taxes, penalties, and interest shall be paid by the personal representative to the extent of assets subject to his or her control. Each payment shall be applied, first, to any interest due on the tax, second, to any penalty imposed by this chapter, and then the balance, if any, to the tax.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 14, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3713.